Washington statutes.
RCW 10.77.070

Examination rights of defendant's expert or professional person.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 1359-S2.SL) ***

When the defendant wishes to be examined by a qualified expert or professional person of his or her own choice such examiner shall be permitted to have reasonable access to the defendant for the purpose of such examination, as well as to all relevant medical and psychological records and reports.

[ 1998 c 297 s 36; 1973 1st ex.s. c 117 s 7.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—Severability—Intent—1998 c 297: See notes following RCW 71.05.010.